Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 701.
Policy.

It is declared to be the policy of the State to provide equal educational opportunities for all children in Vermont by authorizing two or more school districts, including an existing union school district, to establish a union school district for the purpose of owning, constructing, maintaining, or operating schools and to constitute the district so formed a municipal corporation with all of the rights and responsibilities that a town school district has in providing education for its youths.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 701a.
Application of other laws.

The provisions of this subchapter are intended to be in addition to the general provisions of law pertaining to schools and not a limitation upon them, and in the event there is no provision in this subchapter to cover a situation and the situation is covered by the general school law, then the provisions of the general school law apply.

The provisions of general law relating to the administration and maintenance of schools; to school meetings and voting at the meetings; to grand lists; to the raising and expending of school money; to money apportioned by the State Board; to sharing in other State or federal aid; to the election, appointments, powers, duties, and liabilities of school officers; to secondary and elementary instruction; to transportation, board, and attendance of students; to textbooks and appliances; and to all other matters pertaining to schools in a town school district, unless inconsistent with this act or otherwise provided for in this subchapter, shall apply to schools maintained, similar school officers, and all matters pertaining to schools of the union school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 82, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 701b.
Application of chapter.

Whenever referred to in this subchapter, the term “school district” shall include a “town school district,” “incorporated school district,” “union school district,” or “city school district,” and this subchapter shall accordingly apply to the organization and operation of a union school district of which any school district is a member or prospective member. The provisions of this subchapter shall apply and take precedence in the event of any conflict between those provisions and the provisions of the charter of a municipality that is a member or prospective member of a union district. Upon the organization of a union district under this subchapter, any charter of a member municipality is considered to be amended accordingly without further action.

If a union school district votes to participate in a planning committee pursuant to section 706 of this title, its member districts shall not participate on the study committee. If the participating union school district votes to join another union school district that is successfully formed, any conflicting terms of its articles of agreement are repealed in favor of the terms of the articles of agreement of the newly formed union school district. If the proposed union school district is to be a unified union school district, however, only town districts and incorporated districts may participate in the joint study and vote on its formation. A successful vote to form a unified union school district dissolves any preexisting union school district within its borders, and any assets or liabilities held by that union school district shall be transferred to the new unified union district.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 701c.
Definition.

Reference in any statute to “union high school district,” or “union high school” includes a union school district, union elementary school district, or union elementary school.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 38.